California statutes. Elections Code
(a) The ballots used when voting upon a county, city, or district ordinance referred to the voters of the respective jurisdiction as a referendum measure pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9000) shall have printed on them the words “Shall the ordinance (stating the nature thereof, including any identifying number or title) be adopted?” Opposite the statement of the ordinance to be voted on and to its right, or immediately below if there is not sufficient space opposite the statement of the ordinance and to its right, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “Yes,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the ordinance. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed word “No,” the voter’s
 vote shall be counted against its adoption.

(b) The ballots used when voting upon a state statute referred to the voters of the state as a referendum measure pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9000) shall have printed on them the words “Shall California keep or overturn a law passed in [enter year statute was enacted] [followed by no more than 15 words stating the general subject or nature of the law]? Opposite the statement of the statute to be voted on and to its right, or immediately below if there is not sufficient space opposite the statement of the statute and to its right, the words “Keep the law” and “Overturn the law” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets. If a voter marks the voting target next to the printed words “Keep the law,” the voter’s vote shall be counted in favor of the adoption of the statute. If the voter marks the voting target next to the printed words “Overturn the law,” the voter’s vote
 shall be counted against its adoption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 162, Sec. 8.   (AB 421)   Effective September 8, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13121.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the county elections official conducting any school election shall not be required to provide more than one ballot to the same voter for the purpose of voting on separate propositions at the same election. However, no voter shall be presented with a ballot containing a proposition on which he or she is not entitled to vote by reason of not residing within the district or area affected by the proposition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Ballot Printing Specifications [13200. - 13282.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [13200. - 13220.]

13200.

Ballots not printed in substantial compliance with this chapter shall not be cast nor counted at any election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 15.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13201.

The ballots of each political party’s central committee shall be designed so that each ballot may be easily and clearly distinguished from, and not confused with, a ballot of any other political party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 199, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13202.

(a) All ballots of the same sort prepared by any county elections official, clerk or secretary of a legislative body, or other person having charge of preparing ballots for the same polling place, shall be precisely the same size, arrangement, quality and tint of paper, and kind of type, and shall be printed with ink of the same tint, so that without the numbers on the stubs it is impossible to distinguish any one of the ballots from the other ballots of the same sort.

(b) The names of all candidates printed upon the ballot shall be in type of the same size and character. If there is not sufficient space for a candidate name, the size may be adjusted as close as possible to the size
 and character of all the other candidate names printed upon the ballot.

(c) For multilingual ballots, if there is not sufficient space to print candidate names in at least 10-point bold type, as required by Section 13211, the size of candidate names shall be uniformly
 adjusted to a size that is no less than 8-point type.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 16.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13203.

At the top of the first page of the ballot shall be printed in at least 16-point bold type the words “Official Ballot.” Beneath this heading, the name of the election shall be printed in at least 12-point bold type and, in the case of a partisan primary election, the official party designation or the words “Nonpartisan Ballot” shall be printed, as applicable. After the heading line or lines, there shall be printed, in at least 12-point type, the date of the election and, in at least 8-point type, the name of the county in which the ballot is to be voted. The county name may alternatively be displayed in the county seal or logo. In addition, the ballot shall have printed, at the top or bottom of each card, a ballot style identifier or some other means of identifying
 the number of the congressional, Senate, and Assembly district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 17.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13204.

(a) The instructions to voters shall be printed below the ballot identification and above the contests to be voted on, or in the first column of the ballot as long as no contest is placed below the instructions in that column. The instructions shall be in at least 10-point type and in an area clearly separated from the ballot contests.

(b) (1) The instructions shall be written in plain language to communicate the following information:

(A) How to vote for a candidate or in a contest with “Yes” and “No” options.

(B) How to write in a candidate.

(C) What to do if a mistake is made.

(2) The instructions may also include warnings and checks to help voters mark their ballot correctly and avoid errors. Instructions for specific types of contests are required only if a contest of that type appears on the ballot.

(c) (1) For purposes of the instructions described in this section, the following text is recommended:

“Instructions for voting

To vote for a candidate, completely fill in the [voting target] next to the candidate’s name or the word “Yes” or “No.”

To vote for a qualified write-in
 candidate, write the name in the blank space provided and fill in the [voting target].

If you make a mistake, [instructions for making a correction] [or ask for a new ballot].

Make sure your vote counts.

Use a [blue or black ballpoint pen].

Do not select more candidates than the number to be elected. You may vote in as many or as few contests as you want.

A mistake in one contest does not affect the rest of the ballot.”

(2) The recommended instructions in paragraph (1) may be modified to apply to the voting system and ballot format in each county, and the administration of elections in that county.

(d) The instructions may be accompanied by illustrations, customized to the ballot design in each county, that show the correct way of marking a selection on the ballot, writing in a candidate name, or correcting a mistake.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 19.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13206.

(a) (1) On the partisan ballot used in a direct primary election, immediately before or above the contest for President, the following words shall be printed on ballots of parties that require registration as a member of the party to vote in the party’s primary election:

“Party-Nominated Offices

Only voters registered as a member of the [name of party] may vote in this primary election for President and party committee.”

(2) In the same location, the following words shall be printed on ballots of parties that permit voters who have not disclosed a party preference
 to vote in the party’s primary:

“Party-Nominated Offices

Voters registered as a member of the [name of party] may vote in this primary election for President and party committee. Some parties may allow voters with no party preference to vote in the party’s primary election for President.”

(3) For voting systems that do not allow variance in instructions, the following words shall be printed:

“Party-Nominated Offices

Voters registered as a member of the same party as the candidates may vote in this primary election for President and party committee. Some parties may allow voters with no party preference to vote in the party’s primary election for President.”

(b) Before or above the first voter-nominated contest, the following words shall be printed:

“Voter-Nominated Offices

All voters may vote in these contests.

Candidates display a party preference (or None) for the information of voters. This is not a party endorsement or approval.”

(c) Before or above the first nonpartisan contest, or in the same area as the notice for voter-nominated offices, the following words shall be printed:

“Nonpartisan Offices

All voters may vote in these contests.

Candidates for these offices do not display a
 party preference.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 21.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13206.5.

(a) (1) On the ballot used in a statewide general election in each year evenly divisible by the number four, immediately before or above the contest for President, the following words shall be printed:

“Party-Nominated Offices

Candidates for these offices are the official nominee of the party displayed with their name.”

(2) On the ballot used in a statewide general election in each year evenly divisible by the number four, following the portion of the ballot for party-nominated offices, the following words shall be printed:

“Voter-Nominated
 and Nonpartisan Offices

Candidates display a party preference (or None) for the information of voters. This is not a party endorsement or approval.”

(b) On the ballot used in a statewide general election in each even-numbered year that is not evenly divisible by the number four, immediately below the instructions to voters, the following words shall be printed:

“Voter-Nominated and Nonpartisan Offices

Candidates display a party preference (or None) for the information of voters. This is not a party endorsement or approval.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 22.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13207.

(a) There shall be printed on the ballot in parallel columns all of the following:

(1) The respective offices.

(2) The names of candidates with sufficient blank spaces to allow the voters to write in names not printed on the ballot, except that no spaces shall be printed for voter-nominated offices at a general election.

(3) Whatever measures have been submitted to the voters.

(b) In the case of a ballot which is intended for use in a party primary and which carries partisan offices, voter-nominated offices, and nonpartisan offices, a vertical solid black line shall divide
 the columns containing partisan offices, on the left, from the columns containing nonpartisan offices and voter-nominated offices, on the right.

(c) The standard width of columns containing partisan offices, nonpartisan offices, and voter-nominated offices, shall be three inches except that an elections official may vary the width of these columns by up to one inch. The column containing presidential and vice presidential candidates may be as wide as four inches.

(d) A measure that is to be submitted to the voters shall be printed in one or more parallel columns to the right of the columns containing the names of candidates and shall be of sufficient width to contain the
 title and summary of the measure. To the right of or below the title and summary shall be printed, on separate lines, the words “Yes” and “No.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 57, Sec. 5.   (AB 2835)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13208.

(a) A voting target shall be printed next to the name of each voting option. The voting targets shall be used by the voters to express their choices as provided for in the instruction to voters.

(b) The standard voting target shall be at least 0.12 inches across in either dimension.

(c) As used in this section, “target” means an object designated as the aim for a voter to make a vote selection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 23.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13209.

Whenever a foreign translation of the ballot is required by the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended by Public Law 94-73, to appear on the ballot as well as the English language version, the ballot may be so designed as to place the foreign translation next to the voting target.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 24.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13210.

(a) In the case of candidates for delegate to national convention, there shall be printed in at least 10-point bold type, the words, “President of the United States” and “Vote for one group only.”

(b) In the case of candidates for President and Vice President, the words “Vote for One Party” shall appear just below the heading “President and Vice President” and shall be printed so as to appear above the voting targets for that office. The heading “President and Vice President” shall be printed in at least 10-point bold type.

(c) In that section of the ballot designated for judicial offices, next to the heading “judicial” shall
 appear the instruction: “Vote yes or no for each office.”

(d) In the case of candidates for Justice of the Supreme Court and court of appeal, within the rectangle provided for each candidate, and immediately above each candidate’s name, there shall appear the following: “For (designation of judicial office).” There shall be as many of these headings as there are candidates for these judicial offices. No heading shall apply to more than one judicial office. Underneath each heading shall appear the words “Shall (title and name of Justice) be elected to the office for the term provided by law?”

(e) In the case of all other candidates, each group of candidates to be voted on shall be preceded by the designation of the office for which they are running, and the words “vote for one”
 or “vote for no more than two,” or more, according to the number to be nominated or elected. The designation of the office and the words “vote for” shall be printed in at least 9-point bold type. The designation of the office and the directions for voting shall be separated from the candidates by a light line. There shall be no line between the headings for federal or legislative offices and the designation of the office and the directions for voting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 25.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13211.

The names of the candidates shall be printed on the ballot, without indentation, in at least 10-point bold type.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 26.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13211.5.

(a) Each group of names of candidates for a particular office shall be printed in immediate succession to another group of names of candidates for a particular office so as to avoid unnecessary spacing or gaps in the sequence in which each series of groups of names are listed on the ballot.

(b) Spaces may be left on the ballot in order to keep an entire contest together in a single column or page, or to manage the arrangement of contests on the ballot.

(c) When a ballot has multiple pages or cards, an instruction shall be printed to direct the voter to continue to the next page or card.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 27.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13211.7.

(a) (1) In jurisdictions required to provide translated ballot materials pursuant to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503), as that section may be amended from time to time, any ballot that provides a translation of a candidate’s name shall contain a phonetic transliteration of the candidate’s name, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(2) This section applies only to character-based languages, including, but not limited to, Mandarin Chinese, Cantonese, Japanese, and Korean.

(3) If a candidate’s name is to appear on the ballot in more than one
 jurisdiction in an election, all of those jurisdictions required to provide translated ballot materials pursuant to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) shall use the same phonetic transliteration or character-based translation of the name.

(4) (A) In a jurisdiction in which separate ballots containing translations of the candidates’ names are printed in different languages, both the alphabet-based names and the translations of the candidates’ names, for candidates that have translated names, shall appear on the translated ballot.

(B) If a jurisdiction is unable to comply with subparagraph (A) due to limitations of its existing voting system, any new voting system purchased by the jurisdiction after July 1, 2020, shall be able to accommodate the requirements of subparagraph (A).

(b) If a candidate has a character-based name by birth, that can be verified by birth certificate or other valid identification, the candidate may use that name on the ballot instead of a phonetic transliteration. A candidate who does not have a character-based name by birth, but who identifies by a particular character-based name and can demonstrate to
 the local elections official that the candidate has been known and identified within the public sphere by that name over the past two years, may use that name instead of a phonetic transliteration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 82, Sec. 1.   (AB 57)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13212.

Except for a voter-nominated office at a general election, under the designation of each office shall be printed as many blank spaces, defined by light lines, as there are candidates to be nominated or elected to the office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 28.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13213.

Each group of names of candidates for a particular office shall be separated from the succeeding group. Each series of groups shall be headed by a caption that reads “President of the United States,” “President and Vice President,” “State,” “United States Senator,” “United States Representative,” “State Senator,” “Member of the State Assembly,” “County,” or “City” or other proper general classification, as the case may be, printed in at least 10-point bold type. Each caption shall be separated from the names of the candidates beneath.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 29.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13214.

All sides of the columns on the ballot shall be bordered. The binding or stitching of each package of ballots shall be along the top or head of the ballot. If ballots are to be used on a ballot on demand system or another system that prints content onto ballots, ballots are not required to be bound or stitched.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 30.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13215.

(a) The ballots may be printed on the same leaf with a stub not over one inch in depth. The stub may be separated from the ballot by a horizontal perforated line or rule from side to side. Upon this stub shall be printed only the number of the ballot.

(b) Stubs are not required on ballots to be used on a ballot on demand system or another system that prints content onto the ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 863, Sec. 18.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13216.

A ballot stub may be used for a ballot. The ballots may contain printed and distinguishing marks if secrecy in voting is protected.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 32.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13217.

(a) The number on each ballot shall be the same as that on the corresponding stub, and the ballots and stubs shall be numbered consecutively in each county, or the ballots and stubs may be numbered consecutively within each combination of congressional, senatorial, and Assembly districts in each county. In a partisan primary election, the sequence of numbers on the official ballots and stubs for each party within each county, or within each political subdivision in each county, shall begin with the number 1.

(b) In counties using vote centers, ballots may be serialized in the way that best promotes ballot accounting and with the greatest economic efficiency for the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 863, Sec. 21.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13218.

(a) The Secretary of State shall establish a ballot design advisory committee to assist the Secretary of State to promulgate regulations that prescribe ballot design and format.

(b) The ballot design advisory committee shall consist of the Secretary of State, or the secretary’s designee, and members to be appointed by the Secretary of State who are recognized ballot design experts and county elections officials or a designee of a county elections official. Each recognized ballot design expert shall have demonstrated experience with ballot design requirements and knowledge of presenting election materials to voters using plain language methods or another method that is easy for voters to access and understand.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 863, Sec. 22.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13219.

When printed, all ballots shall be bound in stub books, of such size as the clerk may determine. A record of the number of ballots printed shall be kept by the officer authorizing the printing. If stubs are not used pursuant to Section 13216, ballots may be bound by another method determined by the county elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 863, Sec. 23.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13220.

If two or more officers are to be elected for the same office for different terms, the terms for which each candidate for the office is nominated shall be printed on the ballot as a part of the title of the office. If at a general election an office is to be filled for a full term and also for a vacancy in another term, the list of candidates for the full term shall be placed on the ballot under the designation of the office with the words “Full Term” printed immediately after that designation, and the list of candidates to fill the vacancy shall be placed on the ballot under the designation of the office with the words “Short Term” printed immediately after that designation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Allowable Changes in Ballot Format and Printing [13230. - 13233.]

13230.

(a) If the county elections official determines that, due to the number of candidates and measures that must be printed on the ballot, the ballot will be larger than may be conveniently handled, the county elections official may provide that a nonpartisan ballot shall be given to each partisan voter, together with his or her partisan ballot, and that the material appearing under the heading “Voter-Nominated and Nonpartisan Offices” on partisan ballots, as well as the heading itself, shall be omitted from the partisan ballots.

(b) If the county elections official so provides, the procedure prescribed for the handling and canvassing of ballots shall be modified to the extent necessary to permit the use of two ballots by
 partisan voters. The county elections official may, in this case, order the second ballot to be printed on paper of a different tint, and assign to those ballots numbers higher than those assigned to the ballots containing partisan offices.

(c) “Partisan voters,” for purposes of this section, includes both persons who have disclosed a party preference pursuant to Section 2151 or 2152 and persons who have declined to disclose a party preference, but who have chosen to vote the ballot of a political party as authorized by that party’s rules duly noticed to the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 41.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

13231.

If the elections official of any county finds it necessary in connection with the use of any approved method of vote counting, the elections official may provide for any of the following changes in the format of ballots in one or more precincts at any election:

(a) Ballots may be bound and padded at the side.

(b) The left and right edge of ballots may be trimmed to the edge of printed material.

(c) A series of punched holes may be provided in the upper right-hand portion of each ballot.

(d) The ballot number may be placed at any place along the top
 left-hand corner of the ballot.

(e) A cutout section, not to exceed two inches in depth, commencing at the left-hand edge of the far right column of the ballot, may be provided along the top edge of the ballot.

(f) Press perforations may be placed between columns of the ballot, from top to bottom, to permit the folding of the ballot at each perforation.

(g) “Yes” and “No” columns where necessary, may be as narrow as one-quarter inch wide.

(h) The instructions to voters may be placed at the bottom of the ballot instead of at the top of the ballot, and an appropriate reference to the location of the instructions may be printed in the upper right portion of the ballot.

(i) The ballot serial
 number may be placed on any position of the ballot that does not impact other required text or voting targets on the ballot card.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 863, Sec. 24.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13232.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the purpose of conducting the Democratic Party Presidential Primary Election, the Secretary of State may, if it is reasonably necessary to accommodate the limitations of a voter system or vote tabulating device, authorize the county elections officials to do any or all of the following:

(a) Vary the order of any office or measure listed in Section 13109, with the exception of President of the United States, United States Representative, State Senator, Member of the Assembly, and judicial offices.

(b) Place any office listed in Section 13109 on a second ballot, with the exception of United States Representative, State Senator, Member of the State Assembly, judicial offices, County Superintendent of Schools, County Board of Education Members, and county officers.

(c) Place any ballot measure, other than a state measure, on a separate ballot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13233.

In a municipal election, if the number of candidates for an office is such that all of the names will not fit in one column of reasonable length, a double column may be used, and all of the following provisions shall apply:

(a) The space between the two halves of the double column shall be less than that between the double column and any other columns on the ballot, and the lines separating the columns and the two halves of the double column shall be printed so as to emphasize the fact that the candidates in the double column are running for the same office.

(b) The designation of the office and any other
 words required to be at the top of the contest shall be printed across the top of the entire double column with no dividing line. The words “Vote for one,” “Vote for two,” or more, as the case may be, shall be centered over the entire double column and shall be printed below any other words at the top of the double column.

(c) The names of the candidates, including the blank space or spaces necessary to permit the voter to write in the names of persons not printed on the ballot, shall be apportioned as equally as possible between the two columns. The odd space, if any, shall be included in the left-hand column.

(d) The double column shall be used for no more than one office and for no more than one term for any office.

(e) The order of names and blank spaces in the double column shall be the same as would apply to a single column with the left-hand side of the double column taken first.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 34.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Vote Tabulating Devices [13240. - 13247.]

13240.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, the ballots to be counted by means of electronic or electromechanical devices may be of a size, composition, and texture that, and may be printed in any type of ink or combination of inks that, will be suitable for use in the counting devices in which they are intended to be placed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13241.

The names of the candidates and the respective offices shall be printed on the ballot in parallel columns at least 2 inches wide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 57, Sec. 8.   (AB 2835)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13242.

Where electromechanical vote tabulating devices are used to count all or part of the ballots, the names of presidential candidates may be printed in the same column as the names of candidates for other offices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13243.

The ballots may contain printed code marks or punched holes that may be used for placing the ballots in correct reading position in the counting devices. The code marks or punched holes shall not be used in any way that will reveal the identity of the voters voting the ballots.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13244.

The county voter information guide provided pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 13300) shall include a substantial facsimile of the official ballot, including instructions to voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 61.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13246.

The device for marking the ballot may be of any size, shape, or form, and the impression made on the ballot may be in the form of a cross, square, circle, rectangle, or any other design that will clearly indicate the choice of the voter. Any type of ink or other substance that will clearly show the voter’s choice may be used in or in conjunction with the marking device.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13247.

The statement of all measures submitted to the voters shall be abbreviated on the ballot in a ballot label as provided for in Section 9051. The ballot label shall be followed by the words, “Yes” and “No”, except for a statewide referendum measure. The ballot label for a statewide referendum measure shall be followed by the words, “Keep the law” and “Overturn the law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 162, Sec. 9.   (AB 421)   Effective September 8, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Ballot Labels [13282. - 13282.]

13282.

Whenever the Attorney General prepares a condensed ballot title and summary, the Attorney General shall file a copy of the condensed ballot title and summary with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall make a copy of the condensed ballot title and summary as required by subdivision (c) of Section 9051 available for public examination prior to the printing of the ballot label on any ballot. The public shall be permitted to examine the
 condensed ballot title and summary for at least 20 days, and the Secretary of State may consolidate the examination requirement under this section with the public examination requirements set forth in Section 9092. A voter may seek a writ of mandate requiring a condensed ballot title and summary, or portion thereof, to be amended or deleted. The provisions set forth in Section 9092 concerning the issuance of the writ and the nature of the proceedings shall be applicable to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 751, Sec. 8.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. State and County Voter Information Guides [13300. - 13317.]

13300.

(a) By at least 29 days before the partisan primary, each county elections official shall prepare a separate county voter information guide for each political party and a separate nonpartisan county voter information guide. The county elections official shall place in each guide, as applicable, in the order provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100), and under the appropriate title of each office, the names of all candidates for whom nomination papers have been duly filed with the county elections official or have been certified to the county elections official by the Secretary of State, to be voted for in the county elections official’s county at the partisan primary election.

(b) The county voter information guides shall include a substantial facsimile of the official ballots, except as otherwise provided by law. The county voter information guides shall be printed on paper of a different texture from the paper to be used for the official ballot.

(c) One county voter information guide of the party for which the voter has disclosed a preference, as evidenced by the voter’s registration, shall be mailed no later than 10 days before the election to each voter entitled to vote at the primary who registered at least 29 days before the election. A nonpartisan county voter information guide shall be so mailed to each voter who is not registered as preferring any of the parties participating in the primary election. On election day the voter may, upon request, vote the ballot of a political party if
 authorized by the party’s rules, duly noticed to the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 566, Sec. 2.   (SB 151)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13300.5.

In order to facilitate the timely production and distribution of county voter information guides, the county elections official may prepare a combined county voter information guide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 65.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13300.7.

Notwithstanding any other law, county and city elections officials may establish procedures designed to permit a voter to opt out of receiving the voter’s county voter information guide, state voter information guide, notice of polling place, and associated materials by mail, and instead obtain them electronically via email or by accessing them on the county’s or city’s internet website, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The procedures establish a method of providing notice of and an opportunity by which a voter can notify elections officials of the voter’s desire to obtain ballot materials electronically in lieu of receiving them by mail.

(b) The voter email address or any other information provided by the voter under this section remains confidential pursuant to Section 7924.000 of the Government Code and Section 2194 of this code.

(c) The procedures provide notice and opportunity for a voter who has opted out of receiving a county voter information guide and other materials by mail to opt back into receiving them by mail.

(d) The procedures establish a process by which a voter can apply electronically to become a vote by mail voter.

(e) A voter may only opt out of, or opt back into, receiving the voter’s county voter information guide and other ballot materials by mail if the elections official receives the request and can process it
 before the statutory deadline for the mailing of those materials for the next election, pursuant to Section 13303. If a voter misses this deadline, the request shall take effect the following election.

(f) The procedures shall include a verification process to confirm the voter’s identity in any of the following manners:

(1) In writing with a signature card that can be matched to the one on file with the elections official.

(2) Electronically with the electronic transmission containing the voter’s California driver’s license number, California identification number, or a partial social security number.

(3) By telephone or in person, upon confirmation of the voter’s date
 of birth, residence address, and California driver’s license number, California identification number, or a partial social security number.

(g) Information made available over the internet pursuant to this section shall meet or exceed the most current, ratified standards under Section 508 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794d), as amended, and the Web Content Accessibility Guidelines 2.0 adopted by the World Wide Web Consortium for accessibility. Election officials may also implement recommendations of the Voting Accessibility Advisory Committee made pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 2053, and of any local Voting Accessibility Advisory Committee created pursuant to the guidelines promulgated by the Secretary of State related to the accessibility of polling places by the physically handicapped.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 44.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13302.

(a) The county elections official shall forthwith submit the county voter information guide of each political party to the chairperson of the county central committee of that party, and shall mail a copy to each candidate for whom nomination papers have been filed in his or her office or whose name has been certified to him or her by the Secretary of State, to the post office address given in the nomination paper or certification. The county elections official shall post a copy of each county voter information guide in a conspicuous place in his or her office.

(b) In connection with an election at which a candidate for a voter-nominated office will appear on the ballot, a qualified political
 party may submit to the county elections official a list of all candidates for voter-nominated office who will appear on a ballot in the county in question, and who have been endorsed by the party by whatever lawful mechanism the party adopts for endorsing candidates for voter-nominated office. If a political party timely submits a list to the county elections official pursuant to this subdivision, the county elections official shall print the names of the candidates for voter-nominated office who were endorsed by that political party in the voter information portion of the